Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 6. Contested Cases
§ 27-14-606.
Determination and awards are administrative determination as to all parties; notice and hearing requirements.

Each determination or award within the meaning of this act is an administrative determination of the rights of the employer, the employee and the disposition of money within the worker’s compensation account as to all matters involved. No determination shall be final without notice and opportunity for hearing as required by this act.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

“Judicial determination.” —

First Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH) order was not a final appealable order and therefore collateral estoppel was not applicable because it was not a prior adjudication of workers’ compensation benefits, even though it vacated the hearing and directed the Department of Workforce Services, Workers’ Compensation Division to award the claimant workers’ compensation benefits, as the OAH had not heard evidence or argument from the parties and it returned the case to the Division prior to any substantive action. Lower v. Peabody Powder River Servs., LLC ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2020 WY 33, 459 P.3d 443,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 3

3 (Wyo. 2020);

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(March 4, 2020).

Concept of finality balanced with need to assure injured workmen receive benefits. —

An award, being characterized as a judicial determination, is subject to the concept of finality. Given this proposition, former § 27-12-606 (now see §

27-14-605

) represents an attempt by the legislature to balance the concept of finality as applied to worker's compensation awards with the need to assure that injured workmen receive the full amount of any benefits to which they are entitled under the law. Conn v. Ed Wederski Constr. Co., 668 P.2d 649,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 353

(Wyo. 1983), overruled in part, Slater v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Slater), 2001 WY 29, 18 P.3d 1195,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2001).

Employer is entitled to dispute any award or claim

on the basis that it is unreasonable or improper, and certainly can raise the question as to whether the award or claim is causally related to the industrial accident which occurred or whether it may be attributable to some other event. Herring v. Welltech, Inc., 660 P.2d 361,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1983).

Claimant failed to meet her burden

to prove that she was entitled to receive benefits for permanent partial impairment and that the injury arose out of and in the course of her employment, despite previous awards which may have been made for the same injury. Weaver v. Cost Cutters, 953 P.2d 851,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1998).

Estoppel not applicable to outstanding claims. —

Although the employer and the Workers' Compensation Division did not contest the compensability of the initial injury, the employer and Division were not estopped from objecting to an employee's outstanding claims, since each new claim or award involves a separate administrative determination under this section, and the employee had the burden of proving that he was entitled to receive worker's compensation benefits for his outstanding claims. Martinez v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. (In re Martinez), 917 P.2d 619,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1996).

Medical Commission (Commission) was not collaterally estopped from considering evidence of the employee's preexisting condition that could have been presented by the Wyoming Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division in 1998; the Commission determined if the employee's treatment in 2007 was related to his 1991 work injury, which was not identical to the issue considered in 1998.
Taylor v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2010 WY 76, 233 P.3d 583,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2010).

Limitation period not governed by civil rule. —

Because an award of worker's compensation benefits is no longer a “judicial determination,” the modification or termination of such an award should not be governed by the one-year statute of limitations contained in Rule 60(b), W.R.C.P., but is superseded by § 27-14-605(a) (time limitation for modification of benefits). State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Jerding, 868 P.2d 244,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1994).

Award as final adjudication. —

Absent an express reservation of jurisdiction or a declaration by the legislature to the contrary, any award under the act is a final adjudication of the parties as to the matters covered thereby, the same as in any other case. Wyoming State Treasurer ex rel. Workmen's Compensation Dep't v. Niezwaag, 452 P.2d 214,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1969).

An award of compensation to an injured employee is a final judgment, unless expressly reserving jurisdiction to reopen case. Midwest Ref. Co. v. George, 41 Wyo. 55, 281 P. 1005,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1929).

A workers' compensation division's uncontested award of benefits did not rise to the level of a “final adjudication” necessary to apply the doctrine of issue preclusion to outstanding claims for worker's compensation benefits. Tenorio v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 234,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1997), reh'g denied,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. Feb. 4, 1997).

Where the Wyoming Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division did not contest the compensability of an original claim or seek to retract any payments already made to a benefits claimant, but challenged the right to payment of future benefits, the claimant was required to prove that he was entitled to receive benefits for his unpaid claims, despite the previous award.
McIntosh v. State ex rel. Wyo. Med. Comm'n, 2007 WY 108, 162 P.3d 483,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2007).

Judgment properly set aside due to employee's lack of notice. —

Judgment granting an employee full compensation was properly set aside at the same term where employee was not present when the judgment was entered and knew nothing about it until afterward. In re Shaul, 46 Wyo. 549, 30 P.2d 478,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1934).

No worker's compensation determination can be final unless the employer receives notice and an opportunity for a hearing. Padilla v. Lovern's, Inc., 883 P.2d 351,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1994).

“Judicial determination.” —

Payment of a doctor's bill by virtue of an instrument entitled “order of award” executed by the clerk of court, after notice had been given to the employer and a card had been returned indicating receipt of notice and approval, was a “judicial determination” within the purview of this section. In re Millsap, 732 P.2d 1065,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 398

(Wyo. 1987) (decided under prior law).

Method of adjudication irrelevant where no employer objection. —

Whether a claim is adjudicated under the formal dispute procedures, or informally by the clerk of the district court — where there is no employer objection — the character of the award as a judicial determination is not changed. Wyoming State Treasurer ex rel. Worker's Compensation Div. v. Svoboda, 573 P.2d 417,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1978).

Employee, by failing to appeal, without standing to challenge validity of stipulation. —

An employee was without standing to challenge the validity of a stipulation entered into with his employer because he failed to appeal the district court's “final order of award,” which ruled that the stipulation, and the prior court order approving and enforcing the agreement, limited the benefits payable on account of the employee's injury and that the provisions of that prior order should be enforced, but instead filed a petition to reopen the case and appealed from a denial of that petition. In re Injury to Lea, 707 P.2d 754,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 592

(Wyo. 1985).

Applied

in

Fritz v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 937 P.2d 1345,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of fraud to toll the period for bringing actions to enforce workmen's compensation benefits, 15 ALR2d 519.

Workers' compensation: bonus as factor in determining amount of compensation, 84 ALR4th 1055.

§ 27-14-607.
Rights of director to defend against claim; no waiver.

The director or his designee may for any reason appear before the hearing examiner or in the district court and defend against any claim and shall in all respects have the same rights of defense as the employer. Failure to contest a claim does not constitute waiver by the director of his right to participate in further proceedings concerning the award where he does not appear and defend at the original hearing or trial.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Division is granted, by statute, rights equivalent to those of employer,

which include the rights to challenge any claim or move to reopen any award. Wyoming State Treasurer ex rel. Worker's Compensation Div. v. Svoboda, 573 P.2d 417,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1978).

Employer and division may not arrange series of partial trials.—

The scheme for division participation does not contemplate that the employer, with division knowledge, proceed with one trial and present only part of the evidence, and, if unsuccessful, that the division then enter the case with the rest of the evidence and have a second trial. Pacific Power & Light v. Parsons, 692 P.2d 226,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 356

(Wyo. 1984).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Worker's Compensation Div. v. Barker, 978 P.2d 1156,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1999).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div. v. Jerding, 868 P.2d 244,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 27-14-608.
Attorney fees; penalty for violation.

If the hearing examiner under W.S. 27-14-602(d) or the district court or supreme court under W.S.

27-14-615

set a fee for any person for representing a claimant under this act excluding a health care provider, the person shall not receive any additional fee from the claimant.

Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Accrual of right to legal representation. —

The fact that a compensation claimant's right to paid legal representation accrues when the workers' compensation division issues a final determination does not require the hearing examiner to award attorney fees to the claimant's attorney; that determination is made on a case-by-case basis pursuant to the statutory standards. Painter v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 953,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1997), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Fees for appeals allowed. —

The critical word “proceeding” in former § 27-12-604(c) (now see §

27-14-615

) should be interpreted broadly to permit the court to set reasonable attorney's fees for worker's compensation appeals. Graves v. Utah Power & Light Co., 713 P.2d 187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 454

(Wyo. 1986).

Amount awarded modifiable by court. —

The district court could hear an appeal from a hearing examiner's order reducing the compensation of an attorney for a worker's compensation claimant, and could modify the order, where the court found the amount awarded was unreasonable and the hearing examiner provided no factual or legal basis to justify the fee reduction. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Brown, 805 P.2d 830,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1991).

Employee pays attorney fee. —

Amount allowed by statute for attorneys' fees on appeal in workmen's compensation case to supreme court is payable only by the employee, and not out of compensation fund of state. In re Iles, 57 Wyo. 76, 113 P.2d 516,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1941).

Quoted

in

Serda v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 38, 42 P.3d 466,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of claimant's attorney to fee award under § 28(a) of Longshoremen's and Harbor Workers' Compensation Act (33 USC § 928(a)) for unsuccessful work before benefits review board, where decision of board is reversed on appeal, 57 ALR Fed 876.

§ 27-14-609.
Periodic review of temporary total award; physical examination after temporary total award; purpose; report to division.

The division shall review every award for temporary total disability under W.S.

27-14-404

at least once every six (6) months. Upon request by the employer or division, an employee awarded compensation for temporary total disability shall submit to medical examination by a health care provider at a place designated by the employer or division which is reasonably convenient for the employee. The employee may have a licensed health care provider present of his own selection at his own expense.

The results of the examination shall be reported to the division. The division, without delay, shall forward copies to the employer and employee. If after consideration of all medical reports in the case the division determines that the employee has recovered to the extent that temporary total disability no longer applies and his earning ability is substantially restored, compensation shall be discontinued in accordance with W.S.

27-14-404

unless written objection is filed by the employer or employee with the division within ten (10) days from the date of notice.

If an employee refuses to submit to or obstructs the examination, his right to monthly payments shall be suspended until the examination has taken place. No compensation shall be paid during the period of refusal.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1996, ch. 82, § 1.

Inference from absence of report. —

Where physicians of employer who made examination of employee made no report to the court and employer made no explanation, inference is warranted that physicians found nothing in favor of employer's contention. In re Shaul, 46 Wyo. 549, 30 P.2d 478,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1934).

Recoupment of benefits not authorized. —

Subsection (b) does not confer upon the district judge the authority to order the recoupment of temporary disability benefits which the court decides the appellant has received but to which he is not entitled. In re Johner, 643 P.2d 932,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 331

(Wyo. 1982).

As allowing recoupment defeats purpose of worker's compensationprovisions. —

Allowing recoupment of benefits previously paid and utilized by the worker with a good-faith claim would defeat the general purpose of the worker's compensation statutory provisions, which are designed and meant to assist and protect the injured employee through the recovery process. In re Johner, 643 P.2d 932,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 331

(Wyo. 1982).

Hearing, retroactive relief, after benefits terminated constitutional.—

Notwithstanding the question of whether or not worker's interest in temporary total disability benefits is a property right, former § 27-12-602 (see now §

27-14-602

) clearly states that a hearing is available. Procedural due process law is provided if, upon a hearing after termination of temporary total benefits, retroactive relief may be awarded the worker. Higgins v. State, 739 P.2d 129,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 484 U.S. 988, 108 S. Ct. 508, 98 L. Ed. 2d 507, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 5149 (U.S. 1987).

Benefits cease when stability or recovery reached. —

If a physician does not certify that a workman is totally disabled or when it is indicated that he has reached the point of stability or recovery, temporary total disability benefits must cease. Higgins v. State, 739 P.2d 129,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 484 U.S. 988, 108 S. Ct. 508, 98 L. Ed. 2d 507, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 5149 (U.S. 1987).

Quoted

in

Swasso v. State ex rel. Worker's Comp. Div., 751 P.2d 887,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Boe v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2009 WY 115, 216 P.3d 494,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Sept. 17, 2009).

§ 27-14-610.
Health care providers required to testify; refusal; privilege inapplicable.

If directed under this act, any health care provider providing professional attention to an employee may be required to testify before the hearing examiner or any court, provide written reports and attend depositions in a professional capacity. Any health care provider refusing to comply with this section shall forfeit any remuneration or award under this act for services rendered or facilities provided the injured employee. The law of privileged communication between health care provider and patient shall not apply.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Cited

in

Robbins v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2003 WY 29, 64 P.3d 729,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For discussion of physician-patient privilege and the Federal Rules of Evidence, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 601 (1977).

§ 27-14-611.
Administrative determination for compensation; copies to employer and auditor; warrants for payment.

Any administrative determination for compensation to an injured employee or his dependents shall be transmitted by the division to the employer. The division shall transmit a certified copy to the state auditor for filing. The certified copy is direction to the state auditor to issue warrants for payment in accordance with this act.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1996, ch. 82, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

§ 27-14-612.
Appeal by employee; costs.

If an appeal to the district court is prosecuted on behalf of the employee, the employee or attorney representing the employee shall order a record of the proceedings at the hearing to be supplied by the hearing examiner without cost to the employee. An electronic recording of the proceedings may serve as the official transcript but upon appeal, the district court may request a written transcript of the proceedings or any portion of the proceedings. The employee or attorney shall also order the papers on file with the division to be prepared, transcribed, certified and forwarded to the district court without cost to the employee. Docket fees in the district court shall be paid for directly out of the worker’s compensation account.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 28, § 1; 1996, ch. 82, § 1.

§ 27-14-613.
Appeal by employer; stay of award.

If an appeal is prosecuted on behalf of the employer, the record of the proceedings at the original hearing shall be supplied without cost to the employer. An electronic recording of the proceedings may serve as the official transcript but upon appeal, the district court may request a written transcript of the proceedings or any portion of the proceedings. The employer may employ counsel to conduct the appeal on his behalf. Upon request and on appeal by an employer or the division from an order of award, the hearing examiner may stay the payment of the award or that portion appealed from upon any terms as the hearing examiner deems proper.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 28, § 1.

Law reviews. —

Tyler J. Garrett, Anatomy of a Wyoming Appeal: A Practitioner's Guide for Civil Cases, see 16 Wyo. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

§ 27-14-614.
Direct appeal by director from any order; stay of execution; costs.

The director may appeal to the district court from any order or judgment of the hearing examiner awarding compensation or declining to award compensation although he was not a party to the proceedings before the hearing examiner, without the necessity of presenting any petition for reopening of a case to the hearing examiner. After the appeal is perfected, the hearing examiner may stay the execution of the order or judgment appealed from without requiring any bond. The attorney general or his assistant shall represent the director in all cases. All the costs of the new hearings granted upon petition of the director and all costs of appeals conducted by the director shall be paid by the worker’s compensation account except such costs as the court in its discretion shall assess against any of the other parties to the cause.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1991, ch. 91, § 1.

Effect of appeal from order awarding compensation

is to stay the execution of such an order until such time as the propriety of the reopening can be determined. Wyoming State Treasurer ex rel. Worker's Compensation Div. v. Svoboda, 573 P.2d 417,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1978).

Nothing is said in this section as to any relief available to the successful employee by way of any counsel fees

or other costs. In re Brothers, 510 P.2d 19,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1973).

Division has standing to appeal. —

The division has standing to pursue an appeal from an award of benefits by the office of administrative hearings. State ex rel. State Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Garl, 2001 WY 59, 26 P.3d 1029,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2001).

Division entitled to direct appeal from court order reinstatingpayments. —

Where the court entered a pretrial order indicating that the trial date would be used for a further probable-cause hearing on the question of reopening the case and also entered an order reinstating payments to claimants and, upon finding that probable cause to reopen had not yet been shown, rescinding a prior ex parte order which suspended payments and reopened the case pending further investigation and a new hearing, the division was entitled to a direct appeal under this section without regard to its petition to reopen, since the order awarded compensation. Wyoming State Treasurer ex rel. Worker's Compensation Div. v. Svoboda, 573 P.2d 417,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 256

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 27-14-615.
Appointment of attorneys for court proceedings; fees.

The district court may appoint an attorney to represent the employee during proceedings in the district court and appeal to the supreme court. The district court may allow the attorney a reasonable fee for his services at the conclusion of the proceedings in district court and the supreme court may allow for reasonable fees for services at the conclusion of the proceedings in the supreme court. In any appeal where the issue is the compensability of an injury, a prevailing employer’s attorney fees shall also be paid according to the order of the district court or supreme court from the worker’s compensation account, not to affect the employer’s experience rating. An award of attorney’s fees shall be for a reasonable number of hours and shall not exceed the benefits at issue in the appeal. In all other cases, if the employer or division prevails in the district court or supreme court, as the case may be, the fees allowed an employee’s attorney shall not affect the employer’s experience rating.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1995, ch. 193, § 1.

Attorney's fees allowed for appeals. —

The critical word “proceeding” should be interpreted broadly to permit the court to set reasonable attorney's fees for worker's compensation appeals. Graves v. Utah Power & Light Co., 713 P.2d 187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 454

(Wyo. 1986).

The Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH) properly awarded attorney fees to a workers' compensation claimant's appointed attorney in the claimants appeal of a denial of benefits because Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-602(d) does not limit the award of an employee's attorney fees to the “benefits at issue” and there was sufficient evidence in the record to support the determination of the hearing examiner on reasonableness under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-14-126(b)(i). Further Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-615

authorizes the district court to appoint an attorney to represent the employee in proceedings in district court where the employer appeals the attorney fees awarded by the OAH. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Smith, 2005 WY 137, 121 P.3d 150,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(2005).

Attorney fee award not unreasonable merely because not amount requested. —

Merely because the trial court did not award the amount of attorney's fees requested by the worker's attorney did not make the amount awarded unreasonable. Lebsack v. Town of Torrington, 698 P.2d 1141,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1985).

Law not liberally construed for benefit of counsel in providing attorney's fees. —

That the Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Law should be construed liberally in favor of the workman is a holding clearly for the benefit of the workman and should not be extended for the benefit of counsel in providing attorney's fees, unless such allowance can be related directly to the benefit of the workman. Williams v. Northern Dev. Co., 425 P.2d 594,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1967).

Benefits at issue. —

This section did not authorize the award of attorney's fees in a proceeding to review an order of the Internal Unit of the Worker's Compensation and Safety Division because no benefits were at issue in the review sought. Sheneman v. Division of Workers' Safety & Compensation Internal Hearing Unit, 962 P.2d 874,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1998), overruled in part, State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Smith (In re Smith), 2005 WY 137, 121 P.3d 150,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2005).

Sufficiency of order appointing counsel. —

See Claim of Brannan, 455 P.2d 241,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1969).

Trial court's failure to explain award. —

Trial court erred in failing to include any findings of fact or conclusions of law in its order awarding attorney's fees. Gonzales v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Compensation Div. (In re Gonzales), 992 P.2d 560,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1999).

Quoted in

State ex rel. Wyo. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2016 WY 111, 384 P.3d 267,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2016).

Applied

in

Painter v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 953,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1997), overruled on other grounds, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998); Manning v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Comp. Div., 938 P.2d 870,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1997).

Cited

in

Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Swartz, 740 P.2d 401,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 481

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Competency of witness in proceeding for death under workmen's compensation act as affected by dead man's statute, 77 ALR2d 676.

Workmen's compensation: use of medical books or treatises as independent evidence, 17 ALR3d 993.

Admissibility of opinion evidence as to employability on issue of disability in health and accident insurance and workers' compensation cases, 89 ALR3d 783.